Massachusetts, session 194th, H2885.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 3 of Chapter 32 subsection (2) (g) of the General Laws (Group 2) is hereby
amended by inserting after the words “signal maintenance repairmen” the words: “public safety
communications dispatchers, supervisors or operations managers”
of 1